tests/verbs-test-2.yaml
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) iv.aa p3.sg":
    mhuk<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : mhuku
    xuh<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : xuha
    ahachinki<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : ahachinki
    chitanes<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : chitanesu
    chipiles<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : chipilesu

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    mikushem<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nemikushemahena
    chopwix<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nchopwixihena
    alemit<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntalemitahena
    weleleminak<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : neweleleminakihena
    pankpeix<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : mpankpeixahena
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    mhuk<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nemhukihena
    xuh<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nexuhahena
    ahachinki<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntahchinkihena
    chitanes<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nchitanesihena
    chipiles<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nchipilesihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    mikushem<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kemikushemahena
    chopwix<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kchopwixihena
    alemit<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktalemitahena
    weleleminak<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : keweleleminakihena
    pankpeix<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kpankpeixahena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    mhuk<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kemhukihena
    xuh<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kexuhahena
    ahachinki<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktachinkihena
    chitanes<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kchitanesihena
    chipiles<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kchipilesihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) iv.aa p2.pl":
    mikushem<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kemikushemahemo
    chopwix<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kchopwixihemo
    alemit<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktalemitahemo
    weleleminak<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : keweleleminakihemo
    pankpeix<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpankpeixahemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) iv.aa p2.pl":
    mhuk<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kemhukihemo
    xuh<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kexuhahemo
    ahachinki<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktachinkihemo
    chitanes<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kchitanesihemo
    chipiles<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kchipilesihemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) iv.aa p3.pl":
    mikushem<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : mikushemaok
    chopwix<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : chopwixiyok
    alemit<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : alemitaok
    weleleminak<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : weleleminakiyok
    pankpeix<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : pankpeixeyok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) iv.aa p3.pl":
    mhuk<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : mhukuwak
    xuh<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : xuhaok
    ahachinki<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ahachinkiyok
    chitanes<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : chitanesuwak
    chipiles<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : chipilesuwak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) iv.aa p1":
    kanshawen<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkanshaweni
    chitaws<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nchitawsi
    katusem<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkatusemwi
    olhe<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nolhe
    pemuxwe<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpemuxwe

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) iv.aa p1":
    pemaws<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpemawsi
    kentahkus<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkentahkusi
    tkauxkwe<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntkauxkwe
    ahpikws<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntahpikwsi
    shaolam<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nshaolamwi

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) iv.aa p2.sg":
    kanshawen<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kanshaweni
    chitaws<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kchitawsi
    katusem<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : katusemwi
    olhe<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kolhe
    pemuxwe<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpemuxwe

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) iv.aa p2.sg":
    pemaws<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpemawsi
    kentahkus<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kentahkusi
    tkauxkwe<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktkauxkwe
    ahpikws<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktahpikwsi
    shaolam<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kshaolamwi

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) iv.aa p3.sg":
    kanshawen<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kanshawenu
    chitaws<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : chitawsu
    katusem<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : katusemu
    olhe<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : olhe
    pemuxwe<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : pemuxwe

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) iv.aa p3.sg":
    pemaws<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : pemawsu
    kentahkus<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kentahkusu
    tkauxkwe<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : tkauxkwe
    ahpikws<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : ahpikwsu
    shaolam<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : shaolamu

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    kanshawen<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkanshawenihena
    chitaws<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nchitawsihena
    katusem<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkatusemwihena
    olhe<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nolhehena
    pemuxwe<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : mpemuxwehena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    pemaws<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : mpemawsihena
    kentahkus<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkentahkusihena
    tkauxkwe<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntkauxkwehena
    ahpikws<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntahpikwsihena
    shaolam<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nshaolamwihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    kanshawen<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kanshawenihena
    chitaws<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kchitawsihena
    katusem<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : katusemwihena
    olhe<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kolhehena
    pemuxwe<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kpemuxwehena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    pemaws<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kpemawsihena
    kentahkus<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kentahkusihena
    tkauxkwe<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktkauxkwehena
    ahpikws<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktahpikwsihena
    shaolam<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kshaolamwihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) iv.aa p2.pl":
    kanshawen<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kanshawenihemo
    chitaws<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kchitawsihemo
    katusem<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : katusemwihemo
    olhe<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kolhehemo
    pemuxwe<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpemuxwehemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) iv.aa p2.pl":
    pemaws<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpemawsihemo
    kentahkus<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kentahkusihemo
    tkauxkwe<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktauxkwehemo
    ahpikws<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktahpikwishemo
    shaolam<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kshaolamwihemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) iv.aa p3.pl":
    kanshawen<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kanshawenuwak
    chitaws<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kchitawsuwak
    katusem<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : katusemuwak
    olhe<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : olheyok
    pemuxwe<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : pemuxkweyok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) iv.aa p3.pl":
    pemaws<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : pemawsuwak
    kentahkus<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kentahkusuwak
    tkauxkwe<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : tkauxkweyok
    ahpikws<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ahpikwsuwak
    shaolam<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : shaolamuwak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) iv.aa p1":
    kshamehel<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkshamehela
    alemik<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nalemiki
    ahpamsk<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : kahpamska
    ahshahel<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nahshahela
    amexahuelintam<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : namexahuelintam #corrected possible error in base form, switch "e" and "l" position

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) iv.aa p1":
    shamehel<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nshamehela
    mahtetunhe<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemahtetunhe
    koshiphuwe<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkoshiphuwe
    kpechehos<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkpechehosi
    hmitahp<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemitahpi

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) iv.aa p2.sg":
    kshamehel<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kshamehela
    alemik<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kalemiki
    ahpamsk<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kahpamska
    ahshahel<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kahshahela
    amexahuelintam<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kamexahuelintam

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) iv.aa p2.sg":
    shamehel<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kshamehela
    mahtetunhe<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemahtetunhe
    koshiphuwe<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : koshiphuwe
    kpechehos<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpechehosi
    hmitahp<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemitahpi

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) iv.aa p3.sg":
    kshamehel<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kshamehele
    alemik<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : alemiku
    ahpamsk<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : ahpamske
    ahshahel<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> :   ahshahele
    amexahuelintam<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : amexahuelintam

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) iv.aa p3.sg":
    shamehel<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : shamehele
    mahtetunhe<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : mahtetunhe
    koshiphuwe<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : koshiphuwe
    kpechehos<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> :  kpechehosu
    hmitahp<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : hmitahpu

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    kshamehel<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkshamehelahena
    alemik<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nalemikihena
    ahpamsk<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nahpamskahena
    ahshahel<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nahshahelahena
    amexahuelintam<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : namexahuelintamuhena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    shamehel<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nshamehelahena
    mahtetunhe<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nemahtetunhehena
    koshiphuwe<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkoshiphuwehena
    kpechehos<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkpechehosihena
    hmitahp<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nemitahpihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    kshamehel<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kshamehelahena
    alemik<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kalemikihena
    ahpamsk<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kahpamskahena
    ahshahel<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kahshahelahena
    amexahuelintam<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kamexahuelintamuhena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    shamehel<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kshamehelahena
    mahtetunhe<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kemahtetunhehena
    koshiphuwe<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : koshiphuwehena
    kpechehos<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kpechehosihena
    hmitahp<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kemitahpihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) iv.aa p2.pl":
    kshamehel<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kshamehelahemo
    alemik<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kalemikihemo
    ahpamsk<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kahpamskahemo
    ahshahel<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kahshahelahemo
    amexahuelintam<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kamexahuelintamuhemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) iv.aa p2.pl":
    shamehel<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kshamehelahemo
    mahtetunhe<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kemahtetunhehemo
    koshiphuwe<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : koshiphuwehemo
    kpechehos<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpechehosihemo
    hmitahp<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kemitahpihemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) iv.aa p3.pl":
    kshamehel<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kshameheleyok
    alemik<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : alemikuwak
    ahpamsk<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ahpamskeyok
    ahshahel<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ahshaheleyok
    amexahuelintam<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : amexahuelintamuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) iv.aa p3.pl":
    shamehel<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : shameheleyok
    mahtetunhe<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : mahtetunheyok
    koshiphuwe<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : koshiphuweyok
    kpechehos<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kpechehosuwak
    hmitahp<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : hmitahpuwak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 13) iv.aa p1":
    kanshelintam<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkanshelintam
    nahkihel<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nahkihela
    kech<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkechi
    sakomals<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nesakomalsi
    lepo<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nlepo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 14) iv.aa p1":
    lexe<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nlexe
    nathepia<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nathepia
    pehewe<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpehewe
    namewake<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nenamewake
    pent<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpenta
